New York, session 2025-2026, S3748.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 2 of section 2852 of the 2 education law, as amended by section 4-a of part A of chapter 56 of the 3 laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (e) for applicants [for an initial charter pursuant to paragraph (b-1) 5 of subdivision nine of this section] in a school district located in a 6 city with a population of one million or more, the total enrollment of 7 students attending charter schools within the community district in 8 which the charter school will be located in the base year is less than 9 or equal to fifty-five percent of the total public school enrollment 10 attending within such community district in the base year. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08121-01-5